Maine, session 132, LD971.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12555, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 655, Pt. B, §265 and
affected by §422, is amended to read:
1. Prohibition Checking baitfish traps. While trapping for baitfish in the inland
waters with the use of a baitfish trap as defined in section 10001, subsection 7 from April
2nd to October 31st, a person shall check the baitfish trap or cause the baitfish trap to be
checked at least once in every 7 calendar days. While trapping for baitfish in the inland
waters with the use of a baitfish trap from November 1st to April 1st, a person shall check
the baitfish trap or cause the baitfish trap to be checked at least once in every 21 calendar
days.
Sec. 2. Report. The Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall submit a
report related to the baitfish trap checking requirements under the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 12, section 12555, subsection 1 to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over inland fisheries and wildlife matters by January 1, 2029. The report
must include information on whether increasing the time permitted between baitfish trap
checks from November 1st to April 1st has led to any biological consequences or
enforcement challenges. The report must also include information on reported complaints
and accidents, if any, and may include recommendations for suggested legislation. The
committee may report out a bill based on the report to the 134th Legislature in 2029.
Page 1 - 132LR1168(03)